District of Columbia statutes.
31-5335

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of such provision to any circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter or the application of the provision to other circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1236, 45 DCR 1172

History

1981 Ed., § 35-1265.

Prior Codifications